lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_te.txt
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngani  PostInflVI; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngani  PostInflVI;                                             |
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngitni  PostInflVI; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitni  PostInflVI; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitni  PostInflVI;
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflVI; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflVI; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflVI;
^[Loc.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gkeni          PostInflVI; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitni  PostInflVI; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitni  PostInflVI;
                                              ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflVI; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflVI;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mini    PostInflVI; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mini    PostInflVI; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmini          PostInflVI;
^[Loc.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meggni  PostInflVI; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meggni  PostInflVI; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeggni        PostInflVI;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megni   PostInflVI; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megni   PostInflVI; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegni         PostInflVI;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megteni PostInflVI; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megteni PostInflVI; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegteni       PostInflVI;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
! %{%.fL%.%} ^[Jacobson (2001) p.38]

!--------------------------------------------|
!          ALLATIVE (terminalis)             |
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[All.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mun              PostInflVI; ^[All.Pl]:^%{.fL.%}nun             PostInflVI; ^[All.Du]:^gnun                    PostInflVI;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[All.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mnun            PostInflVI; ^[All.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mnun            PostInflVI; ^[All.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemnun          PostInflVI;
^[All.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mnnun           PostInflVI; ^[All.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mnnun           PostInflVI; ^[All.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemnnun         PostInflVI;
^[All.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegnun         PostInflVI; ^[All.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegnun         PostInflVI; ^[All.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegnun       PostInflVI;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpenun          PostInflVI; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpenun          PostInflVI; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpenun          PostInflVI;
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegnun         PostInflVI; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegnun         PostInflVI; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegnun         PostInflVI;
^[All.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesinun        PostInflVI; ^[All.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesinun        PostInflVI; ^[All.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesinun        PostInflVI;
^[All.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegnun       PostInflVI; ^[All.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegnun       PostInflVI; ^[All.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegnun       PostInflVI;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[All.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}nganun   PostInflVI; ^[All.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}nganun   PostInflVI; ^[All.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkenun          PostInflVI;
^[All.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}nganun  PostInflVI; ^[All.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}nganun  PostInflVI;                                              |
^[All.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngitnun  PostInflVI; ^[All.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitnun  PostInflVI; ^[All.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitnun  PostInflVI;
^[All.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflVI; ^[All.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflVI; ^[All.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflVI;
^[All.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gkenun          PostInflVI; ^[All.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitnun  PostInflVI; ^[All.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitnun  PostInflVI;
                                               ^[All.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflVI; ^[All.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflVI;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[All.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}minun    PostInflVI; ^[All.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}minun    PostInflVI; ^[All.4SgPoss.Du]:^gminun          PostInflVI;
^[All.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meggnun  PostInflVI; ^[All.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meggnun  PostInflVI; ^[All.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeggnun        PostInflVI;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megnun   PostInflVI; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megnun   PostInflVI; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegnun         PostInflVI;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megtenun PostInflVI; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megtenun PostInflVI; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegtenun       PostInflVI;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
! %{%.fL%.%} ^[Jacobson (2001) p.38]

!-----------------------------------------------|
!              PERLATIVE (vialis)               |
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.Sg]:^%{.f.%}kun                 PostInflVI; ^[Prl.Pl]:^tgun                       PostInflVI; ^[Prl.Du]:^gnekun                  PostInflVI;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mkun               PostInflVI; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mkun               PostInflVI; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemkun          PostInflVI;
^[Prl.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mteggun            PostInflVI; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mteggun            PostInflVI; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemteggun       PostInflVI;
^[Prl.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegnegun          PostInflVI; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegnegun          PostInflVI; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegnegun     PostInflVI;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegun             PostInflVI; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegun             PostInflVI; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegun          PostInflVI;
^[Prl.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesigun           PostInflVI; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesigun           PostInflVI; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesigun        PostInflVI;
^[Prl.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegnegun        PostInflVI; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegnegun        PostInflVI; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegnegun     PostInflVI;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngakun      PostInflVI; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngakun      PostInflVI; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkenkun         PostInflVI;
^[Prl.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngakun     PostInflVI; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngakun     PostInflVI;                                              |
^[Prl.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngitgun     PostInflVI; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngitgun     PostInflVI; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitgun  PostInflVI;
^[Prl.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitgun    PostInflVI; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitgun    PostInflVI; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitgun PostInflVI;
^[Prl.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gkenkun            PostInflVI; ^[Prl.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngakun      PostInflVI; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitgun  PostInflVI;
                                                  ^[Prl.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngakun     PostInflVI; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitgun PostInflVI;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mikun       PostInflVI; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mikun       PostInflVI; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmikun          PostInflVI;
^[Prl.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megteggun   PostInflVI; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megteggun   PostInflVI; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmegteggun      PostInflVI;
^[Prl.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megtegnegun PostInflVI; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megtegnegun PostInflVI; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegtegnegun    PostInflVI;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|

!--------------------------------------------|
!             EQUATIVE (equalis)             |
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.Sg]:^%{.f.%}tun              PostInflVI; ^[Equ.Pl]:^stun                    PostInflVI; ^[Equ.Du]:^gestun                 PostInflVI;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mtun            PostInflVI; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mtun            PostInflVI; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemtun         PostInflVI;
^[Equ.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mtestun         PostInflVI; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mtestun         PostInflVI; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemtestun      PostInflVI;
^[Equ.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegestun       PostInflVI; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegestun       PostInflVI; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegestun    PostInflVI;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpetun          PostInflVI; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpetun          PostInflVI; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpetun         PostInflVI;
^[Equ.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesistun       PostInflVI; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesistun       PostInflVI; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesistun      PostInflVI;
^[Equ.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegetun      PostInflVI; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegetun      PostInflVI; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegetun     PostInflVI;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngatun   PostInflVI; ^[Equ.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngatun   PostInflVI; ^[Equ.3SgPoss.Du]:^gketun         PostInflVI;
^[Equ.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngatun  PostInflVI; ^[Equ.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngatun  PostInflVI;                                             |
^[Equ.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngitun   PostInflVI; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitun   PostInflVI; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitun  PostInflVI;
^[Equ.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun  PostInflVI; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun  PostInflVI; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun PostInflVI;
^[Equ.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gketun          PostInflVI; ^[Equ.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitun   PostInflVI; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitun  PostInflVI;
                                               ^[Equ.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun  PostInflVI; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun PostInflVI;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mitun    PostInflVI; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mitun    PostInflVI; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmitun         PostInflVI;
^[Equ.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megestun PostInflVI; ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megestun PostInflVI; ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmegestu       PostInflVI;
^[Equ.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megestun PostInflVI; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megestun PostInflVI; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegestun      PostInflVI;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|

!-------------------------------------------|
! Obsolete Verb Root -ete                   |
! ^[Jacobson (2001) p.78]                   |
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^%{.f.%}m              VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Pl]:^%{.fL.%}n             VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Du]:^gn                    VerbRootEte;
